Washington statutes.
RCW 44.04.345

Legislative oral history account.

The legislative oral history account is created in the custody of the state treasurer. All moneys received under RCW 44.04.340 and from the legislative gift center account created in RCW 44.73.020 must be deposited in the account. Expenditures from the account may be made only for the purposes of the legislative oral history program under RCW 44.04.320. Only the secretary of the senate or the chief clerk of the house of representatives or their designee may authorize expenditures from the account. An appropriation is not required for expenditures, but the account is subject to allotment procedures under chapter 43.88 RCW.

[ 2008 c 222 s 8.]

NOTES:

Purpose—2008 c 222: See note following RCW 44.04.320.